src/dictionaries/fr_FR.aff
SFX g Y 110
SFX g   ds         d          prends
SFX g   ds         ne         prends
SFX g   ds         nes        prends
SFX g   ds         nent       prends
SFX g   ts         t          [ae]ts
SFX g   s          te         [ae]ts
SFX g   s          tes        [ae]ts
SFX g   s          tent       [ae]ts
SFX g   s          t          fais
SFX g   ais        ont        fais
SFX g   is         sse        fais
SFX g   is         sses       fais
SFX g   is         ssions     fais
SFX g   is         ssiez      fais
SFX g   is         ssent      fais
SFX g   is         ît         [^t][nr]ais
SFX g   is         it         [^t][nr]ais
SFX g   0          sent       [^t][nr]ais
SFX g   0          se         [^t][nr]ais
SFX g   0          ses        [^t][nr]ais
SFX g   s          t          trais
SFX g   s          ent        trais
SFX g   s          e          trais
SFX g   s          es         trais
SFX g   s          t          [és]cris
SFX g   s          vent       [és]cris
SFX g   s          ve         [és]cris
SFX g   s          ves        [és]cris
SFX g   s          t          [cldf]is
SFX g   0          ent        [cldf]is
SFX g   0          e          [cldf]is
SFX g   0          es         [cldf]is
SFX g   s          t          uis
SFX g   0          ent        uis
SFX g   0          e          uis
SFX g   0          es         uis
SFX g   s          t          ois
SFX g   s          ent        ois
SFX g   s          e          ois
SFX g   s          es         ois
SFX g   s          t          sous
SFX g   us         lvent      sous
SFX g   us         lve        sous
SFX g   us         lves       sous
SFX g   t          ts         sout
SFX g   ut         lvent      sout
SFX g   ut         lve        sout
SFX g   ut         lves       sout
SFX g   s          t          meus
SFX g   s          vent       meus
SFX g   s          ve         meus
SFX g   s          ves        meus
SFX g   s          t          dors
SFX g   s          ment       dors
SFX g   s          me         dors
SFX g   s          mes        dors
SFX g   s          t          sers
SFX g   s          vent       sers
SFX g   s          ve         sers
SFX g   s          ves        sers
SFX g   cs         c          vaincs
SFX g   cs         quent      vaincs
SFX g   cs         que        vaincs
SFX g   cs         ques       vaincs
SFX g   x          t          vaux
SFX g   ux         lent       vaux
SFX g   ux         le         vaux
SFX g   ux         les        vaux
SFX g   s          t          bous
SFX g   s          illent     bous
SFX g   s          ille       bous
SFX g   s          illes      bous
SFX g   s          t          sors
SFX g   s          te         sors
SFX g   s          tes        sors
SFX g   s          tent       sors
SFX g   is         ît         plais
SFX g   0          ent        plais
SFX g   0          e          plais
SFX g   0          es         plais
SFX g   s          t          tais
SFX g   0          ent        tais
SFX g   0          e          tais
SFX g   0          es         tais
SFX g   ais        aît        pais
SFX g   0          sent       pais
SFX g   0          se         pais
SFX g   0          ses        pais
SFX g   s          t          hais
SFX g   is         ïssent     hais
SFX g   is         ïsse       hais
SFX g   is         ïsses      hais
SFX g   s          t          sais
SFX g   is         vent       sais
SFX g   is         che        sais
SFX g   is         ches       sais
SFX g   is         chent      sais
SFX g   s          t          fris
SFX g   ds         d          sieds
SFX g   ieds       eyent      sieds
SFX g   ieds       eye        sieds
SFX g   ieds       eyes       sieds
SFX g   ds         d          couds
SFX g   ds         sent       couds
SFX g   ds         se         couds
SFX g   ds         ses        couds
SFX g   ds         d          mouds
SFX g   ds         lent       mouds
SFX g   ds         le         mouds
SFX g   ds         les        mouds

SFX v Y 13
SFX v   s          t          ais
SFX v   ais        ions       [^çe]ais
SFX v   ais        iez        [^çe]ais
SFX v   çais       cions      çais
SFX v   çais       ciez       çais
SFX v   eais       ions       eais
SFX v   eais       iez        eais
SFX v   s          ent        ais
SFX v   ais        ons        ais
SFX v   ais        ez         [^çe]ais
SFX v   çais       cez        çais
SFX v   ais        z          eais
SFX v   is         nt         ais

SFX c Y 3
SFX c   is         nts        ais
SFX c   is         nte        ais
SFX c   is         ntes       ais

SFX d Y 16
SFX d   s          t          sais
SFX d   ais        ons        sais
SFX d   ais        ions       sais
SFX d   sais       tes        sais
SFX d   ais        iez        sais
SFX d   s          ent        sais
SFX d   is         nt         sais
SFX d   s          t          pouvais
SFX d   is         nt         pouvais
SFX d   ais        ons        pouvais
SFX d   ais        ions       pouvais
SFX d   ais        ez         pouvais
SFX d   ais        iez        pouvais
SFX d   s          ent        pouvais
SFX d   ouvais     uissions   pouvais
SFX d   ouvais     uissiez    pouvais

SFX w Y 38
SFX w   i          s          ai
SFX w   ai         a          ai
SFX w   ai         âmes       ai
SFX w   ai         âtes       ai
SFX w   ai         èrent      [^çe]ai
SFX w   çai        cèrent     çai
SFX w   eai        èrent      eai
SFX w   i          sse        ai
SFX w   i          sses       ai
SFX w   ai         ât         ai
SFX w   i          ssions     ai
SFX w   i          ssiez      ai
SFX w   i          ssent      ai
SFX w   s          t          s
SFX w   s          rent       s
SFX w   is         îmes       is
SFX w   is         îtes       is
SFX w   is         ît         is
SFX w   0          se         [iuû]s
SFX w   0          ses        [iuû]s
SFX w   0          sions      [iuû]s
SFX w   0          siez       [iuû]s
SFX w   0          sent       [iuû]s
SFX w   us         ûmes       us
SFX w   us         ûtes       us
SFX w   us         ût         us
SFX w   s          mes        ûs
SFX w   s          tes        ûs
SFX w   ins        înmes      ins
SFX w   ins        întes      ins
SFX w   0          se         ins
SFX w   0          ses        ins
SFX w   ins        înt        ins
SFX w   0          sions      ins
SFX w   0          siez       ins
SFX w   0          sent       ins
SFX w   s          mes        haïs
SFX w   s          tes        haïs

SFX x Y 10
SFX x   i          s          rai
SFX x   ai         a          rai
SFX x   ai         ons        rai
SFX x   ai         ez         rai
SFX x   ai         ont        rai
SFX x   0          s          rai
SFX x   0          t          rai
SFX x   ai         ions       rai
SFX x   ai         iez        rai
SFX x   0          ent        rai
